District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.19

Board of directors — Number; election; classification; and removal.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 273, Pub. L. 87-569, § 19
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.19.
1981 Ed., § 29-519.
1973 Ed., § 29-1019.